Arkansas, session 2025, SB486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Clarify and reconcile the meaning of "sex", "male", and
"female" in state law; and
(2) Preserve order and dignity in women's restrooms, changing
rooms, and sleeping quarters in facilities where women have traditionally
been afforded privacy and safety.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 9, Chapter 6, is amended to add an
additional section to read as follows:
9-6-113. Safety and privacy in shelters — Designation of certain rooms
based on sex — Definitions.
*LGL049*
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Changing room" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
(2) "Female" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
(3) "Male" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
(4) "Multi-occupancy" means the same as defined under § 22-3-
2201;
(5) "Restroom" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
(6) "Sex" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201; and
(7) "Sleeping quarter" means the same as defined under § 22-3-
2201.
(b) A shelter shall designate each multi-occupancy restroom, changing
room, and sleeping quarter for the exclusive use of females or males.
(c)(1) Every restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarter in a shelter
that is designated for the exclusive use of females or males shall only be
used by a member of the designated sex.
(2) A person shall not enter a restroom or changing room that is
designated for the exclusive use of females or males unless he or she is a
member of the designated sex.
(3) A shelter shall not require a person to share a sleeping
quarter with a member of the opposite sex.
(d) A shelter shall take reasonable steps to provide an individual
with privacy in a designated restroom, changing room, and sleeping quarter
from use by a member of the opposite sex.
(e) This section shall not apply to a person who enters a restroom,
changing room, or sleeping quarter designated for the opposite sex to:
(1) Perform custodial services or maintenance;
(2) Render medical assistance;
(3) Perform duties arising under the course and scope of
employment as a law enforcement officer, employee, or contractor;
(4) Seek protection in a designated shelter area during a threat
of an emergency or a natural disaster; or
(5) Provide aid during a threat of a natural disaster or a
serious threat to good order or safety.
(f) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a shelter from:
(1) Adopting policies necessary to accommodate:
(A) Persons protected under the Americans with
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as it existed on January
1, 2025;
(B) Young children in need of assistance; or
(C) Elderly persons requiring aid;
(2) Establishing a single-occupancy restroom, changing room, or
sleeping quarter, or a family restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarter;
or
(3) Redesignating a multi-occupancy restroom, changing room, or
sleeping quarter designated for exclusive use by one (1) sex to a designation
for exclusive use by the opposite sex.
(g) A person in a restroom or changing room designated for use by his
or her sex who encounters a person of the opposite sex has a private cause of
action for damages and declaratory and injunctive relief against the shelter
in which the restroom or changing room is located if the shelter:
(1) Provided the person of the opposite sex permission to use a
restroom or changing room of the opposite sex; or
(2) Failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the person of
the opposite sex from using the restroom or changing room of the opposite
sex.
(h) A person required by the shelter to share a sleeping quarter
designated for use by his or her sex with a person of the opposite sex has a
private cause of action for damages and declaratory and injunctive relief
against the shelter.
(i)(1) A civil action brought pursuant to subsection (g) or subsection
(h) of this section shall be commenced within two (2) years of the date the
cause of action arises.
(2) A person who prevails in an action brought under subsection (g) or
subsection (h) of this section may recover reasonable attorney fees and costs
from the offending shelter.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 28, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-28-110. Safety and privacy in state correctional facilities —
Designation of certain rooms based on sex — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Changing room" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
(2)(A) "Correctional facility" means a state correctional
facility that has the power to detain or restrain a person under the laws of
the state, including without limitation facilities operated by the Division
of Correction or the Division of Community Correction.
(B) "Correctional facility" does not include a temporary
municipal holding facility;
(3) "Facility" means a correctional facility or a juvenile
detention facility;
(4) "Female" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
(5) "Juvenile detention facility" means any facility for the
temporary care of juveniles alleged to be delinquent or adjudicated
delinquent and awaiting disposition who require secure custody in a
physically restraining facility designed and operated with all entrances and
exits under the exclusive control of the facility's staff so that the
juvenile may not leave the facility unsupervised or without permission under
§ 12-41-803;
(6) "Male" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
(7) "Multi-occupancy" means the same as defined under § 22-3-
2201;
(8) "Restroom" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
(9) "Sex" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201; and
(10) "Sleeping quarter" means the same as defined under § 22-3-
2201.
(b) A facility shall designate each multi-occupancy restroom, changing
room, and sleeping quarter for the exclusive use of females or males.
(c)(1) Every restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarter in a
facility that is designated for the exclusive use of females or males shall
only be used by a member of the designated sex.
(2) A person shall not enter a restroom or changing room that is
designated for the exclusive use of females or males unless he or she is a
member of the designated sex.
(3) A facility shall not require a person to share a sleeping
quarter with a member of the opposite sex.
(d) A facility shall take reasonable steps to provide an individual
with privacy in a designated restroom, changing room, and sleeping quarter
from use by a member of the opposite sex.
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
(e) This section shall not apply to a person who enters a restroom,
changing room, or sleeping quarter designated for the opposite sex to:
(1) Perform custodial services or maintenance;
(2) Render medical assistance;
(3) Perform duties arising under the course and scope of
employment as a law enforcement officer, employee, or contractor;
(4) Seek protection in a designated shelter area during a threat
of an emergency or a natural disaster;
(5) Provide aid during a threat of a natural disaster or a
serious threat to good order or safety; or
(6) Address, supervise, or treat athletes that the individual is
overseeing as a coach or an athletics personnel member during a reasonable
time before an athletic event, during an athletic event, or immediately
following an athletic event if:
(A) The coach or the athletics personnel member verifies
that no person is in a state of undress at any time while the coach or the
athletics personnel member is present; and
(B) An adult other than the coach or the athletics
personnel member is also present.
(f) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a facility from:
(1) Adopting policies necessary to accommodate:
(A) Persons protected under the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as it existed on January
1, 2025;
(B) Young children in need of assistance; or
(C) Elderly persons requiring aid;
(2) Establishing a single-occupancy restroom, changing room, or
sleeping quarter, or a family restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarter;
(3) Redesignating a multi-occupancy restroom, changing room, or
sleeping quarter designated for exclusive use by one (1) sex to a designation
for exclusive use by the opposite sex; or
(4) Assigning a transgender or intersex inmate in a housing or
programming assignment on a case-by-case basis to ensure the health and
safety of the inmate under 28 C.F.R. § 115.42, as it existed on January 1,
2025.
(g) A person in a restroom or changing room designated for use by his
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
or her sex who encounters a person of the opposite sex has a private cause of
action for declaratory and injunctive relief against the facility in which
the restroom or changing room is located if the facility:
(1) Provided the person of the opposite sex permission to use a
restroom or changing room of the opposite sex; or
(2) Failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the person of
the opposite sex from using the restroom or changing room of the opposite
sex.
(h) A person required by the facility to share a sleeping quarter
designated for use by his or her sex with a person of the opposite sex has a
private cause of action for declaratory and injunctive relief against the
facility.
(i)(1) The Arkansas State Claims Commission shall have jurisdiction
under § 19-10-201 et seq. over all claims made under subsection (g) or
subsection (h) of this section for damages otherwise barred by the doctrine
of sovereign immunity.
(2) A claim made under subdivision (i)(1) of this section shall
be filed within two (2) years of the date the cause of action arises.
(j)(1) A civil action brought under subsection (g) or subsection (h)
of this section shall be commenced within two (2) years of the date the cause
of action arises.
(2)(A) A person who substantially prevails in an action brought
under subsection (g) or subsection (h) of this section may file a claim with
the commission to recover reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation
expenses reasonably incurred under § 19-10-204.
(B) A claim for reasonable attorney's fees and other
litigation expenses reasonably incurred under subdivision (j)(2)(A) of this
section shall be filed with the commission within sixty (60) days of the
final disposition of the action.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 41, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-41-111. Safety and privacy in local correctional facilities —
Designation of certain rooms based on sex — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Changing room" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
(2)(A) "Correctional facility" means a local correctional
facility that has the power to detain or restrain a person under the laws of
the state, including without limitation facilities operated by the Division
of Correction or the Division of Community Correction.
(B) "Correctional facility" does not include a temporary
municipal holding facility;
(3) "Facility" means a correctional facility or a juvenile
detention facility;
(4) "Female" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
(5) "Juvenile detention facility" means any facility for the
temporary care of juveniles alleged to be delinquent or adjudicated
delinquent and awaiting disposition who require secure custody in a
physically restraining facility designed and operated with all entrances and
exits under the exclusive control of the facility's staff so that the
juvenile may not leave the facility unsupervised or without permission under
§ 12-41-803;
(6) "Male" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
(7) "Multi-occupancy" means the same as defined under § 22-3-
2201;
(8) "Restroom" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201;
(9) "Sex" means the same as defined under § 22-3-2201; and
(10) "Sleeping quarter" means the same as defined under § 22-3-
2201.
(b) A facility shall designate each multi-occupancy restroom, changing
room, and sleeping quarter for the exclusive use of females or males.
(c)(1) Every restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarter in a
facility that is designated for the exclusive use of females or males shall
only be used by members of the designated sex.
(2) A person shall not enter a restroom or changing room that is
designated for the exclusive use of females or males unless he or she is a
member of the designated sex.
(3) A facility shall not require a person to share a sleeping
quarter with a member of the opposite sex.
(d) A facility shall take reasonable steps to provide an individual
with privacy in a designated restroom, changing room, and sleeping quarter
from use by a member of the opposite sex.
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
(e) This section shall not apply to a person who enters a restroom,
changing room, or sleeping quarter designated for the opposite sex to:
(1) Perform custodial services or maintenance;
(2) Render medical assistance;
(3) Perform duties arising under the course and scope of
employment as a law enforcement officer, employee, or contractor;
(4) Seek protection in a designated shelter area during a threat
of an emergency or a natural disaster;
(5) Provide aid during a threat of a natural disaster or a
serious threat to good order or safety; or
(6) Address, supervise, or treat athletes that the individual is
overseeing as a coach or an athletics personnel member during a reasonable
time before an athletic event, during an athletic event, or immediately
following an athletic event if:
(A) The coach or the athletics personnel member verifies
that no person is in a state of undress at any time while the coach or the
athletics personnel member is present; and
(B) An adult other than the coach or the athletics
personnel member is also present.
(f) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a facility from:
(1) Adopting policies necessary to accommodate:
(A) Persons protected under the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as it existed on January
1, 2025;
(B) Young children in need of assistance; or
(C) Elderly persons requiring aid;
(2) Establishing a single-occupancy restroom, changing room, or
sleeping quarter, or a family restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarter;
(3) Redesignating a multi-occupancy restroom, changing room, or
sleeping quarter designated for exclusive use by one (1) sex to a designation
for exclusive use by the opposite sex; or
(4) Assigning a transgender or intersex inmate in a housing or
programming assignment on a case-by-case basis to ensure the health and
safety of the inmate under 28 C.F.R. § 115.42, as it existed on January 1,
2025.
(g) A person in a restroom or changing room designated for use by his
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
or her sex who encounters a person of the opposite sex has a private cause of
action for damages and declaratory and injunctive relief against the facility
in which the restroom or changing room is located if the facility:
(1) Provided the person of the opposite sex permission to use a
restroom or changing room of the opposite sex; or
(2) Failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the person of
the opposite sex from using the restroom or changing room of the opposite
sex.
(h) A person required by the facility to share a sleeping quarter
designated for use by his or her sex with a person of the opposite sex has a
private cause of action for damages and declaratory and injunctive relief
against the facility.
(i)(1) A civil action brought pursuant to subsection (g) or subsection
(h) of this section shall be commenced within two (2) years of the date the
cause of action arises.
(2) A person who prevails in a civil action brought under
subsection (g) or subsection (h) of this section may recover reasonable
attorney fees and costs from the offending facility.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 22, Chapter 3, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 22 — Safety and Privacy in Public Buildings

22-3-2201. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Changing room" means a room or area in which a person may
be in a state of undress in the presence of others, including without
limitation a locker room or a shower room;
(2) "Female" means an individual who naturally has, had, will
have, or would have but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or
unintentional disruption the reproductive system that at some point produces,
transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization;
(3) "Governmental entity" means every department, division,
office, board, commission, institution, and political subdivision of this
state;
(4) "Male" means an individual who naturally has, had, will
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
have, or would have but for a congenital anomaly or intentional or
unintentional disruption the reproductive system that at some point produces,
transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization;
(5) "Multi-occupancy" means a space designed for use by multiple
persons simultaneously;
(6) "Public building" means a building or related facility
occupied by a governmental entity;
(7) "Restroom" means a room that includes one or more toilets or
urinals;
(8) "Sex" means an individual's biological sex, either male or
female; and
(9) "Sleeping quarter" means a room with a bed in which more
than one (1) individual is housed overnight.

22-3-2202. Safety and Privacy in Public Buildings — Designation of
certain rooms based on sex.
(a) A governmental entity occupying a public building shall designate
each multi-occupancy restroom, changing room, and sleeping quarter for the
exclusive use of females or males.
(b)(1) Every restroom, changing room, or sleeping quarter in a public
building that is designated for the exclusive use of females or males shall
only be used by a member of the designated sex.
(2) A person shall not enter a restroom or changing room that is
designated for the exclusive use of females or males unless he or she is a
member of the designated sex.
(3) A governmental entity occupying a public building shall not
require a person to share a sleeping quarter with a member of the opposite
sex.
(c) A governmental entity occupying a public building shall take
reasonable steps to provide an individual with privacy in a designated
restroom, changing room, and sleeping quarter from members of the opposite
sex.
(d) This section shall not apply to a person who enters a restroom,
changing room, or sleeping quarter designated for the opposite sex to:
(1) Perform custodial services or maintenance;
(2) Render medical assistance;
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
(3) Perform duties arising under the course and scope of
employment as a law enforcement officer, employee, or contractor;
(4) Seek protection in a designated shelter area during a threat
of an emergency or a natural disaster;
(5) Provide aid during a threat of a natural disaster or a
serious threat to good order or safety; or
(6) Address, supervise, or treat athletes that the individual is
overseeing as a coach or an athletics personnel member during a reasonable
time before an athletic event, during an athletic event, or immediately
following an athletic event if:
(A) The coach or the athletics personnel member verifies
that no person is in a state of undress at any time while the coach or the
athletics personnel member is present; and
(B) An adult other than the coach or the athletics
personnel member is also present.
(e) This section shall not be construed to prohibit a governmental
entity occupying a public building from:
(1) Adopting policies necessary to accommodate:
(A) Persons protected under the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq., as it existed on January
1, 2025;
(B) Young children in need of assistance; or
(C) Elderly persons requiring aid;
(2) Establishing a single-occupancy restroom, a changing room,
or sleeping quarter, or a family restroom, changing room, or sleeping
quarter; or
(3) Redesignating a multi-occupancy restroom, changing room, or
sleeping quarter designated for exclusive use by one (1) sex to a designation
for exclusive use by the opposite sex.

22-3-2203. Remedies.
(a) A person in a restroom or changing room designated for use by his
or her sex who encounters a person of the opposite sex has a private cause of
action for damages, if the governmental entity is a political subdivision of
the state and declaratory and injunctive relief against the governmental
entity occupying a public building in which the restroom or changing room is
03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
located if the governmental entity:
(1) Provided the person of the opposite sex permission to use a
restroom or changing room of the opposite sex; or
(2) Failed to take reasonable steps to prohibit the person of
the opposite sex from using the restroom or changing room of the opposite
sex.
(b) A person required by the governmental entity occupying a public
building to share a sleeping quarter designated for use by his or her sex
with a person of the opposite sex has a private cause of action for damages,
if the governmental entity is a political subdivision of the state and
declaratory and injunctive relief against the governmental entity occupying a
public building.
(c)(1) The Arkansas State Claims Commission shall have jurisdiction
under § 19-10-201 et seq. over all claims made under subsection (a) or
subsection (b) of this section for damages otherwise barred by the doctrine
of sovereign immunity.
(2) A claim made under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall
be filed within two (2) years of the date the cause of action arises.
(d)(1) A civil action brought under subsection (a) or subsection (b)
of this section shall be commenced within two (2) years of the date the cause
of action arises.
(2)(A) A person who substantially prevails in an action brought
under subsection (a) or subsection (b) of this section may file a claim with
the commission to recover reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation
expenses reasonably incurred under § 19-10-204.
(B) A claim for reasonable attorney's fees and other
litigation expenses reasonably incurred under subdivision (d)(2)(A) of this
section shall be filed with the commission within sixty (60) days of the
final disposition of the action.

SECTION 6. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY. If any provision of this act
or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act
which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and
to this end, the provisions of this act are declared severable.

03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049

As Engrossed: S3/31/25 SB486
/s/B. Johnson



































03-31-2025 16:36:03 LGL049